Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4205.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; 180 DEGREES.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for the Office of Justice Programs to provide a grant to 180 Degrees' Great River Landing and Clifton Place programs to engage in community outreach, partnership development, mobile case management, family reunification, aftercare, job attainment, follow up, and housing placement when young adults, up to age 24, are released from juvenile detention or prison. The pilot program must specifically seek to address the lack of resources for the large number of young adults reentering the community post-incarceration or detention. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end